tree-sitter-lexc/test/highlight/basic.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
! <- keyword.control

%<x%>

;
! <- punctuation.delimiter

LEXICON Root
! <- keyword.control
!       ^ entity.name.function
X ;
! <- entity.name.function
! ^ punctuation.delimiter

LEXICON X
! <- keyword.control
!       ^ entity.name.function
x:y Z "weight: 3" ;
!   ^ entity.name.function
!     ^ number
!                 ^ punctuation.delimiter
a:b C "hi" ;
!   ^ entity.name.function
!     ^ string.quoted
<[ 1 | 2 | 3 ]+> # ;
! <- punctuation.bracket
!              ^ punctuation.bracket
!                ^ keyword.control
!                  ^ punctuation.delimiter

LEXICON Punct
! <- keyword.control
!       ^ entity.name.function
<[ %& | %= ]+> PUNCT ; ! Use/MT
! <- punctuation.bracket
!            ^ punctuation.bracket
!              ^ entity.name.function
!                    ^ punctuation.delimiter
!                      ^ comment
